Vermont, session 2025-2026, H798.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to exercise the power granted to
Vermont by the 10th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution to protect the health,
safety, and welfare of its residents by promoting society’s crucial trust in law
enforcement officers and ensuring that persons who present themselves as law
enforcement officers are not engaging in unlawful impersonation.
VT LEG #386224 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.798
2026 Page 2 of 3
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 3002 is amended to read:
§ 3002. IMPERSONATION OF OFFICER
(a) A person who impersonates or attempts to impersonate a sheriff, deputy
sheriff, constable, police officer, fish and game warden, or any other State,
county, or town officer, or any federal law enforcement officer shall:
(1) for the first offense, be imprisoned not more than six months or fined
not more than $500.00, or both; or
(2) for the second offense and subsequent offenses, be imprisoned not
more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall apply to a law enforcement officer
who impersonates or attempts to impersonate a law enforcement officer of a
different law enforcement agency.
(c) A law enforcement officer may request officer identification from
another person, including a law enforcement officer of a different law
enforcement agency, whom the law enforcement officer has probable cause to
believe is violating subsection (a) of this section.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2351a.
VT LEG #386224 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.798
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2351a and includes any officer of a federal law enforcement agency or any
person acting on behalf of a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386224 v.1